Tennessee, session 114, HB0448.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-10-1304, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(k) Each LEA and public charter school shall incorporate at least two (2) hours
each school year of evidence-based skills training on positive behavioral interventions
and supports, conflict prevention, functional behavior assessments, de-escalation, and
conflict management into its behavior intervention training program. Notwithstanding an
in-service plan adopted pursuant to § 49-6-3004(c)(1), the training required in this
subsection (k) may be used to satisfy two (2) hours of the in-service training required in
§ 49-6-3004.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-10-1304(j), is amended by
deleting subdivision (3).
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0448
001055
- 1 -